Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-735
Warrant of arrest; issuance.

If the Governor decides that the demand should be complied with, he shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal, and be directed to any peace officer or other person whom he may think fit to entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 7, p. 560.